South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3926.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This joint resolution may be cited as the "Commission on Fiscal Restraint and Government Efficiency." SECTION 2.  (A) There is created the Commission on Fiscal Restraint and Government Efficiency. The voting members of the commission shall be comprised of: (1) three members appointed by the President of the Senate; (2) three members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and (3) three members appointed by the Governor from the State at-large; (B) The commission shall be chaired by the Director of the Department of Administration, or her designee. The commission chair shall be a nonvoting member. (C) No members of the commission may be members of the General Assembly. (D) Commissioners shall serve without compensation and are not entitled to mileage, subsistence, or per diem as provided by law for members of state boards, committees, and commissions. (E) The commission shall utilize staff from the General Assembly and the executive branch at the discretion of the chair. The commission also may engage third-party consultants or other experts in related fields to fulfill its duties and obligations. SECTION 3.  The commission shall conduct a survey of the structure and funding of state government to determine how to modernize it so that state government is less costly and more efficient for our State's taxpayers. In fulfilling its duties and obligations the commission shall: (1) review appropriations in the state budget and identify areas for spending reductions; (2) review the Code of Regulations to determine which regulations can be repealed to reduce the regulatory burden on businesses operating in our State, specifically small- and medium-sized businesses; (3) review the Code of Regulations to determine which regulations can be repealed to reduce the regulatory burden on our citizens' property rights; (4) identify redundant, conflicting, or oppressive regulations; (5) identify government programs, agencies, departments, boards, and commissions that can be eliminated, consolidated, or otherwise restructured in order to increase government efficiency; and (6) conduct other reviews and make other recommendations that the commission identifies as being necessary and proper to reduce spending, increase efficiency, and reduce the state government's burden on our citizens' quality of life or economic development. SECTION 4.  The commission shall first undertake the review of appropriations in the state budget to identify areas where spending reductions are appropriate. The commission's findings shall identify the amount of recommended reductions and identify the source of the reductions as specifically as possible, down to the program or subprogram level if possible. The commission shall report its findings to the President of the Senate, Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the House of Representatives Ways and Means Committee, and the Governor no later than October 1, 2025. The commission's report shall be published on the General Assembly's and the Governor's website. SECTION 5.  Following the commission's recommendations concerning reductions in appropriations, the commission shall then work to fulfill its remaining duties and obligations. The commission shall report its findings to the President of the Senate, Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the House of Representatives Ways and Means Committee, and the Governor no later than October 1, 2026. The commission's report shall be published on the General Assembly's and the Governor's website. SECTION 6.  This joint resolution is repealed on October 2, 2026. SECTION 7.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----